Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201448-3101
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) Work experience
is necessary to obtain employment in a competitive job market;

(2) Businesses find
creating capacity to add employees during a time of economic recovery challenging;

(3) Subsidized
employment can benefit employers and workers in need of experience;

(4) Increasing
opportunities for public assistance recipients to engage in meaningful workplace
experience can significantly contribute to their long-term employability;

(5) Providing subsidized
employment can also help businesses to grow; and

(6) States nationwide provide
subsidized employment to public assistance recipients in order to aid employers
in developing work placements for public assistance recipients.

Laws 2013, LB368, § 1.
July 1, 2014